North Dakota, session 69, SB2311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-01-20.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-01-20.1. Bioscience innovation grant program - Continuing appropriation.
1. The commissioner shall collaborate with a localan association in the state having
bioscience experience to develop and administer a bioscience innovation grant
program through the bioscience innovation grant fund. The commissioner shall
collaborate with the department of commerce when awarding bioscience innovation
grants to coordinate the management of the commissioner's bioscience innovation
grant program and the department of commerce's biotechnology grant
programassociation collaborating with the commissioner shall:
a. Promote the bioscience innovation program;
b. Engage in recruiting bioscience and biotechnology organizations to the state;
c. Determine eligibility of applicants; and
d. Conduct performance reviews and audits of program participants and provide a
report to the commissioner.
2. The commissioner may reimburse the collaborating association under subsection 1 up
to six hundred thousand dollars per biennium for costs incurred and services rendered
under this program.
2.3. The commissioner shall collaborate with the committee established under
subsection 56 to adopt rules and criteria necessary to administer the bioscience
innovation grant program. The rules must include criteria for program eligibility,
Page No. 1 25.1269.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
including requiring a bioscience business that receives funding through the program
match up to fifty percent of the amount of the grant received.
3.4. The bioscience innovation grant fund is a special fund created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the commissioner to
award grants to:
a. Support biotechnology innovation and commercialization in areas including crop
genetics, biofuels, biomaterials, biosensors, and biotechnology in relation to food,
nutrition, animals, humans, equipment, medical and health products and
services, medical diagnostics, medical therapeutics, and farm-based
pharmaceuticals;
b. Promote the creation of bioscience jobs in the state to be filled by graduates from
institutions under the control of the state board of higher education;
c. Encourage the development of new bioscience technologies and bioscience
startup companies in the state;
d. Leverage the agriculture industry in the state to support the development of
bioscience technologies impacting livestock operations and crop production;
e. Promote bioscience research and development at institutions under the control of
the state board of higher education; and
f. Encourage coordination and collaboration among other entities and programs in
the state to promote bioscience innovation goals.
4.5. A bioscience business operating in the state is eligible to receive a grant funds under
the program if the business:
a. Employs at least two employees;
b. Has documented annual sales of less than two million five hundred thousand
dollars; and
c. Is a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, limited
partnership, or limited liability partnership registered in the state and is in good
standing.
5.6. The bioscience innovation program shall award grant funding through a committee
consisting of:
Page No. 2 25.1269.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. One representative from the department of agriculture appointed by the
agriculture commissioner;
b. One representative from the bioscience association of North Dakota appointed by
the board of the bioscience association of North Dakota; and
c. One representative from the department of commerce appointed by the
commissioner of the department of commerce;
d. One representative from the university of North Dakota appointed by the
university of North Dakota; and
e. One representative from North Dakota state university appointed by North
Dakota state university.
6.7. Grant funds awarded under this section may not be used for capital improvements,
academic programming or curriculum, or workforce training.
Page No. 3 25.1269.01000